Arkansas, session 2025, SB29.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - MINORITY HEALTH INITIATIVE. There is
hereby established for the Department of Health - Arkansas Minority Health
Commission for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of
regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) L038C REGISTERED NURSE 1 GRADE MP01
(2) A082C ACCOUNTANT II 1 GRADE GS08
*MAH010*
01/06/2025 3:41:11 PM MAH010

SB29
(3) G147C GRANTS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(4) L053C HEALTH PROGRAM SPECIALIST I 1 GRADE GS06
(5) R025C HUMAN RESOURCES ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(6) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE GS05
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 6

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - MINORITY HEALTH INITIATIVE. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Health, to be payable from the Targeted
State Needs Program Account, for personal services and operating expenses of
the Department of Health - Arkansas Minority Health Commission - Arkansas
Minority Health Initiative for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $326,124
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 122,431
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 531,788
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 20,000
(C) PROF. FEES 250,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 0
(05) SCREENING, MONITORING, TREATING &
OUTREACH 558,554
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,808,897

SECTION 3. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
PROMOTIONAL ITEMS. The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall establish
upon request for the Arkansas Minority Health Commission a special
Promotional Items appropriation to be used in the acquisition of promotional
items. When the Arkansas Minority Health Commission wishes to transfer from
its operating expenses and/or Screening, Monitoring, Treating, Outreach &
Advertising appropriation and funds to the promotional items line, the
01/06/2025 3:41:11 PM MAH010

SB29
request shall be forwarded by the Arkansas Minority Health Commission to the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State for processing and for prior approval by
the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee. Determining the
maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of appropriation and
general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year is the
prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and
the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly
has determined that the Arkansas Minority Health Commission may operate more
efficiently if some flexibility is provided to the Department of Health -
Arkansas Minority Health Commission authorizing broad powers under this
Section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General
Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee as provided by this section. The
requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by
the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional
by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 4. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
RESTRICTIONS. The appropriations provided in this act shall not be
transferred under the provisions of Arkansas Code 19-4-522, but only as
provided by this act.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 5. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFERS
OF APPROPRIATION. In the event the amount of any of the budget
classifications of maintenance and general operation in this act are found by
the administrative head of the agency to be inadequate, then the agency head
may request, upon forms provided for such purpose by the Chief Fiscal Officer
01/06/2025 3:41:11 PM MAH010

SB29
of the State, a modification of the amounts of the budget classification. In
that event, he or she shall set out on the forms the particular
classifications for which he or she is requesting an increase or decrease,
the amounts thereof, and his or her reasons therefor. In no event shall the
total amount of the budget exceed either the amount of the appropriation or
the amount of the funds available, nor shall any transfer be made from the
capital outlay or data processing subclassifications unless specific
authority for such transfers is provided by law, except for transfers from
capital outlay to data processing when determined by the Department of
Transformation & Shared Services - Division of Information Systems that data
processing services for a state agency can be performed on a more cost-
efficient basis by the Department of Transformation & Shared Services -
Division of Information Systems than through the purchase of data processing
equipment by that state agency. In considering the proposed modification as
prepared and submitted by each state agency, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State shall make such studies as he or she deems necessary. The Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State shall, after obtaining the approval of the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee, approve the requested transfer if in his
or her opinion it is in the best interest of the state.
The General Assembly has determined that the agency in this act could be
operated more efficiently if some flexibility is given to that agency and
that flexibility is being accomplished by providing authority to transfer
between certain items of appropriation made by this act. Since the General
Assembly has granted the agency broad powers under the transfer of
appropriations, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General
Assembly maintain oversight of the utilization of the transfers by requiring
prior approval of the Legislative Council in the utilization of the transfer
authority. Therefore, the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council
is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by
the Legislative Council is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent
jurisdiction, this entire section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 6. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
01/06/2025 3:41:11 PM MAH010

SB29
POSITIONS. (a) Nothing in this act shall be construed as a commitment of the
State of Arkansas or any of its agencies or institutions to continue funding
any position paid from the proceeds of the Tobacco Settlement in the event
that Tobacco Settlement funds are not sufficient to finance the position.
(b) State funds will not be used to replace Tobacco Settlement funds when
such funds expire, unless appropriated by the General Assembly and authorized
by the Governor.
(c) A disclosure of the language contained in (a) and (b) of this Section
shall be made available to all new hire and current positions paid from the
proceeds of the Tobacco Settlement Commission by the Department of Health -
Arkansas Minority Health Commission.
(d) Whenever applicable the information contained in (a) and (b) of this
section shall be included in the employee handbook and/or Professional
Services Contract paid from the proceeds of the Tobacco Settlement.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 7. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds authorized by this act
shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency and funds made
available by law for the support of such appropriations; and the restrictions
of the State Purchasing Law, the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures
Law, the Regular Salary Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors,
and other fiscal control laws of this State, where applicable, and
regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and Administration, as
authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in disbursement of said
funds.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 8. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General Assembly that any funds
disbursed under the authority of the appropriations contained in this act
shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for which this act was
01/06/2025 3:41:11 PM MAH010

SB29
adopted, as evidenced by Initiated Act 1 of 2000, the Agency Requests,
Executive Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the
budget manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration,
letters, or summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and
adoption.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 9. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.
















01/06/2025 3:41:11 PM MAH010